Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. Purposes and Activities.

Sec. 10.50.010.
Authorized purposes.

A limited liability company may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose, including the rendering of a professional service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 2007)

Sec. 10.50.015.
Compliance with other laws.

If an activity of a limited liability company or the purpose for which a limited liability company is organized is subject to another provision of law, the company shall also comply with the other provision of law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)